North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
“(c) Funding for this pilot program shall be made available through the Enhanced Federal Funding for Health Homes for the Chronically Ill.”

Session Laws
2011-185, s. 2(a), provides: “The Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services of the Department of Health and Human Services shall collaborate with military agencies and other appropriate organizations to determine gaps in the care of current and former members of the reserve or active components of the Armed Forces of the United States with traumatic brain injury, shall develop recommendations for an accessible community-based neurobehavioral system of care for those service members, and shall report its recommendations by July 1, 2012, to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Subcommittees on Health and Human Services and Justice and Public Safety, to the Chairs of the House of Representatives Committee on Homeland Security, Military, and Veterans Affairs, and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services. The recommendations shall be tailored so that, if implemented, services would be available to service members, veterans, and their families and would consist of neurobehavioral programs, residential programs, comprehensive day programs, and home-based programs.”

Session Laws
2011-185, s. 2(b), provides: “The Division of Medical Assistance of the Department of Health and Human Services, MedSolutions, Inc., and the appropriate health professionals at the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall work together to ensure that MedSolutions, Inc., is using the appropriate evidence-based diagnostic testing (including imaging, biomarker testing, and other tests) for screening and assessment of traumatic brain injury.”

Session Laws
2011-185, s. 3(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The North Carolina Area Health Education Centers (AHEC) Program shall facilitate and continue to provide health education and skills training for health professional students; primary care, mental health, and substance abuse service providers; and hospital administrators about the health, mental health, and substance abuse needs of the military and their families. This training shall include information about the following:

“(1) The number of North Carolinians who are serving or who have served in the active or reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States.

“(2) Military culture.

“(3) The average number of deployments, length of time in conflict zones, and potential injuries these members may have faced, particularly those who have served recently in Iraq or Afghanistan.

“(4) The types of health, mental health, and substance abuse disorders that service personnel may have experienced, including traumatic brain injury (TBI), posttraumatic stress disorder (PTSD), military sexual trauma (MST), depression, substance use disorders, potential suicide risks, or domestic violence.

“(5) The potential impact of the deployment cycle on family members and children. This information shall include information about resiliency skills, intervention skills, resources, and community supports.

“(6) Evidence-based screening and assessment instruments.

“(7) Evidence-based case management, treatment, and medication management for different mental health and substance abuse problems, and potential adverse effects of prescribed medications, particularly for people with comorbidities.

“(8) Information about the TRICARE system, payment, and enrollment procedures.

“(9) Available referral sources through TRICARE, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, Military One Source, Army One Source, Defense Centers of Excellence, Deployment Health Clinical Center, the North Carolina National Guard’s Integrated Behavioral Health System, Local Management Entities, the North Carolina Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) Office of Citizen Services, North Carolina Health Info, Federally Qualified Health Centers, professional advocacy and support services, and other community resources.

“(b) In carrying out the requirements of Section 3(a) of this act, the AHEC Program shall collaborate with the Citizen Soldier Support Program; North Carolina health professional training programs; the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; the North Carolina Division of Veterans Affairs; The University of North Carolina; Operation Re-Entry North Carolina; the North Carolina Community College System; health care professional associations; the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services; Governor’s Focus on Servicemembers, Veterans, and Their Families; and academic health programs.”

Similar provisions contained in Session Laws
2011-117, ss. 1-6, were repealed by Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.9(a).

Session Laws
2001-424, s. 21.20(a) provides: “(a) In order to promote consistency among providers and to ensure that medical coverage criteria are uniformly applied to Medicaid recipients throughout the State, the Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt medical coverage policies for the State Medicaid Program that are consistent with national standards or Department-defined standards. If the Department determines that application of a national standard would likely cause significant deterioration in the quality of or access to appropriate medical care, then the Department shall substitute for that national standard an evidence-based, best-practice standard that will not compromise quality of or access to appropriate medical care. The adoption of new or amended medical coverage policies under the State Medicaid Program are exempt from the rule-making requirements of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.” Session Laws
2001-424, s. 21.20(b) sets out criteria for the development, amendment and adoption of medical coverage policy.

Session Laws
2011-264, s. 1, as amended by Session Laws
2012-151, s. 13, provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall proceed with statewide restructuring of the management responsibilities for the delivery of services for individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders through expansion of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. It is the intent of the General Assembly that expansion of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver will be completed by July 1, 2013, and will result in the establishment of a system that is capable of managing all public resources that may become available for mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services, including federal block grant funds, federal funding for Medicaid and Health Choice, and all other public funding sources. In implementing the restructuring and expansion authorized in this section, the Department shall do all of the following:

“(1) Establish accountability for the development and management of a local system that ensures easy access to care, the availability and delivery of necessary services, and continuity of care for consumers in need of mental health, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“(2) Maintain fidelity to the Piedmont Behavioral Health (PBH) demonstration model, a proven system for the operation of all public resources for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

“(3) Designate an area authority for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services to assume responsibility for all aspects of Waiver management. The following operational models are acceptable:

“a. Merger model: A single larger LME is formed from the merger of two or more LMEs.

“b. Interlocal agreement among LMEs: A single LME is identified as the leader for all Waiver operations, financial management, and accountability for performance measures.

“(4) Use managed care strategies, including care coordination and utilization management, to reduce the trend of escalating costs in the State Medicaid program while ensuring medically necessary care and deploy a system for the allocation of resources based on the reliable assessment of intensity of need. The Department shall design these strategies to efficiently direct consumers to appropriate services and to ensure that consumers receive no more and no less than the amount of services determined to be medically necessary and at the appropriate funding level.

“(5) As the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver expands statewide, phase out the current CAP-MR/DD Waiver as well as the utilization management functions currently performed by public and private contractors.

“(6) Design the Innovations Waiver in such a way as to serve the maximum number of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities within aggregate funding.

“(7) Require LMEs approved to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver to do all of the following:

“a. Maintain a local presence in order to respond to the unique needs and priorities of localities.

“b. Implement a process for feedback end exchange of information and ideas to ensure communication with consumers, families, providers, and stakeholders regarding disability-specific and general Waiver operations.

“c. Establish and maintain systems for ongoing communication and coordination regarding the care of individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders with other organized systems such as local departments of social services, Community Care of North Carolina, hospitals, school systems, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and other community agencies.

“d. Comply with the following operational requirements:

“1. Maintain disability specific infrastructure and competency to address the clinical, treatment, rehabilitative, habilitative, and support needs of all disabilities covered by the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver.

“2. Maintain administrative and clinical functions, including requirements for customer service, quality management, due process, provider network development, information systems, financial reporting, and staffing.

“3. Maintain full accountability for all aspects of Waiver operations and for meeting all contract requirements specified by the Department. The Department shall not require LMEs to subcontract any managed care functions or nonservice activities to other entities. However, LMEs that choose to subcontract managed care functions to other entities will be limited to the following:

“I. Information systems.

“II. Customer service (including call center) operations.

“III. Claims processing.

“IV. Provider, enrollment, credentialing, and monitoring.

“V. Professional services.

“VI. Treatment Plan development.

“VII. Referral to services.

“(b) By August 1, 2011, the Department shall select LMEs that have been assessed to meet minimum criteria for Waiver operations according to the requirements of RFA #2011-261 issued on April 1, 2011.

“(c) The Department shall require LMEs that have not been approved by the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver by January 1, 2013, to merge with or be aligned through an interlocal agreement with an LME that has been approved by the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. If any LME fails to comply with this requirement, or fails to meet performance requirements of an approved contract with the Department to operate a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver, the Department shall assign responsibility for management of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver on behalf of the noncompliant LME to an LME that is successfully operating the Waiver and successfully meeting performance requirements of the contract with the Department. Those LMEs approved to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver under an interlocal agreement must have a single LME entity designated as responsible for all aspects of Waiver operations and solely responsible for meeting contract requirements.

“(d) County governments are not financially liable for overspending or cost overruns associated with an area authority’s operation of a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver. County governments are not financially liable for overspending or cost overruns of Medicaid services associated with a county program or multicounty program’s operation of a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver beyond the county program or multicounty program’s Medicaid risk reserve and Medicaid fund balance amounts.

“(e) Providers of targeted case management under the CAP-MR/DD Waiver are qualified to provide the 1915(c) service known as Community Guide under the Innovations Waiver. During the first year of assuming responsibility for Waiver operations, LMEs shall offer to contract with providers that were previously approved to provide targeted case management to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities under the CAP-MR/DD Waiver, for the provision of Community Guide services.

“(f) By December 31, 2011, the Department shall determine the feasibility of adding habilitation services to the State Medicaid Plan through the 1915(i) Option as a strategy to address the needs of Medicaid enrollees with IDD who are not enrolled in the Innovations Waiver and are not residing in an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded (ICF-MR facility).

“(g) The Department shall consider the impact on ICF-MR facilities included in the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver to determine and, to the extent possible, minimize potential inconsistencies with the requirements of

G.S. 131E-176

and

G.S. 131E-178

without negatively impacting the viability and success of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver programs.

“(h) The Department shall discontinue the pilot program to administer the Supports Intensity Scale to people with intellectual and developmental disabilities in non-Waiver LMEs.

“(i) The Department shall establish written policies ensuring alignment of objectives and operational coordination of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver and the care of individuals with mental illness, intellectual and developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders with other organized systems under the auspices of the Department, including Community Care of North Carolina.

“(j) In the development of the budget for the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium and subsequent biennia, the General Assembly shall consider a reinvestment of at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total projected State savings for that biennium from the operation of the 1915(b)/(c) Waiver, for the purpose of expanding the number of consumers served by the Innovations 1915(c) Medicaid Waiver, or for the purpose of expanding other services that are designed to meet the needs of individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

“(k) By October 1, 2011, the Department, in coordination with the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, the Division of Medical Assistance, LMEs, PBH, and with stakeholder input, shall submit to the appropriate Oversight Committee of the General Assembly a strategic plan delineating specific strategies and agency responsibilities for the achievement of the objectives and deadlines set forth in this Act.

“(
l
) The Department shall submit status reports to the General Assembly on the restructuring and expansion authorized in this section on January 1, 2012, April 1, 2012, October 1, 2012, February 1, 2013, and October 1, 2013.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.5, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, shall design and draft a 1915(c) wavier that meets the following requirements:

“(1) The waiver should create 1,000 new slots each year for 3 years, to serve a total of 3,000 additional adults with developmental disabilities from January 1, 2016, to June 30, 2019.

“(2) The budget for each slot should be capped at twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per plan year per beneficiary, and slots will target individuals on the registry of unmet needs.

“(3) The slots should be managed as part of the LME/MCO managed care system.

“The Department shall report the draft waiver, other findings, and any other options or recommendations to best serve the additional adults with developmental disabilities on the registry of unmet needs to the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services by March 1, 2015. The Department may submit drafts of the waiver to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to solicit feedback but shall not submit the waiver for CMS approval until authorized by the General Assembly.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.6, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance, and Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, in conjunction with the North Carolina Traumatic Brain Injury Advisory Council, shall design and draft a 1915(c) waiver to add a new service package for Medicaid eligibles with traumatic brain injury (TBI). This draft waiver may be based on an update to the 2010 report on a waiver to serve individuals with traumatic brain injury. The Department shall report the draft waiver, other findings, and any additional options to provide Medicaid services to those suffering from TBI to the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services by February 1, 2015. The Department may submit drafts of the waiver to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to solicit feedback but shall not submit the waiver for CMS approval until authorized by the General Assembly.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12H.6(a), provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Medical Assistance and Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services (Department), shall submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services a request for approval of the 1915(c) waiver for individuals with traumatic brain injury (TBI) that the Department designed pursuant to Section 12H.6 of S.L. 2014-100, which the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services recommended as part of its December 2014 report to the General Assembly, and which is further described in the Department’s February 1, 2015, report to the General Assembly.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12H.6(b), provides: “The Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the status of the Medicaid TBI waiver request and the plan for implementation no later than December 1, 2015. The Department shall submit an updated report by March 1, 2016. Each report shall include the following:

“(1) The number of individuals who are being served under the waiver and the total number of individuals expected to be served.

“(2) The expenditures to date and a forecast of future expenditures.

“(3) Any recommendations regarding expansion of the waiver.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12H.6(d), provides: “The waiver and any State Plan amendments required to implement this section shall not be subject to the 90-day prior submission requirement of

G.S. 108A-54.1

A(e) [repealed].”

Session Laws
2018-81, s. 1, provides: “Beginning October 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) shall report quarterly to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the status and implementation of the 1915(c) waiver for individuals with traumatic brain injury (TBI) that has been submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services in accordance with Section 12H.6 of S.L. 2015-241.

“As part of the process of implementing the TBI waiver, DHHS shall adopt rules or medical coverage policies relating to service programs for individuals with traumatic brain injury, including setting standards that ensure that individuals with brain injuries who require residential treatment receive appropriate, effective, and high-quality treatment in community-based residential settings. Additionally, DHHS shall develop a best practice model system that includes a comprehensive continuum of care and an array of short-term and long-term treatments, rehabilitation options, and home and community support services as part of the TBI waiver. Finally, DHHS shall strive to maintain adequate reimbursement rates for residential and community-based care programs that serve individuals with traumatic brain injury, which will aid in attracting and retaining quality and highly specialized providers and programs into North Carolina.”

Session Laws
2014-100, s. 12H.13(a)-(c), as amended by Session Laws
2020-88, s. 13(e), provides: “(a) Effective July 1, 2014, supplemental payments that increase reimbursement to the average commercial rate for certain eligible medical providers described in the Medicaid State Plan, Attachment 4.19-B, Section 5, Pages 2 and 3, shall be modified as follows:

“(1) The number of eligible medical professional providers shall be limited as follows:

“a. 418 with the East Carolina University (ECU) Brody School of Medicine.

“b. 1,176 with the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill (UNC) Faculty Physicians.

“c. 14 with the UNC Hospitals Pediatric Clinic.

“d. 75 with UNC Physicians Network.

“e. 18 with Chatham Hospital.

“(2) Supplemental payments shall not be made for services provided in Wake County.

“The Department of Health and Human Services shall not make any other modifications to the portion of the Medicaid State Plan referenced in this section, except as provided herein.

“(b)

(Repealed effective July 1, 2021)

Beginning on December 31, 2014, and annually thereafter, UNC and ECU shall submit an annual report based on their preceding fiscal year to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services containing all of the following information for each individual provider for whom this supplemental payment is received:

“(1) For each service provided by the provider and for which the supplemental payment is received, the location where the service was provided, including county, municipality, and zip code.

“(2) The percentage of the provider’s total time spent serving Medicaid recipients annually that is for services provided at locations other than the ECU Brody School of Medicine, the Firetower Medical Office, or the UNC School of Medicine.

“(3) The amount of Medicaid reimbursement for each service for which a supplemental payment was made for services provided by the provider.

“(4) On an annual basis, the percentage of the provider’s time spent engaging in the following:

“a. Clinical patient care.

“b. Teaching.

“c. Research.

“d. Other activities.

“(c) Any State plan amendments required to implement this section shall not be subject to the 90-day prior submission requirement of

G.S. 108A-54.1

A(e) [repealed].”

Session Laws
2018-5, s. 11H.11(a), (b), provides: “(a) Effective July 1, 2018, supplemental payments that increase reimbursement to the average commercial rate for certain eligible medical providers described in the Medicaid State Plan, Attachment 4.19-B, Section 5, Pages 2 and 3, shall be modified to increase the number of eligible medical professional providers listed in subdivision (1) of Section 12H.13(a) of S.L. 2014-100 by 60. The allocation of the increase among the listed entities shall be determined by the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(b) No later than October 1, 2018, the Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice regarding the allocation of the 60 additional medical professional providers eligible for supplemental payments, as required by subsection (a) of this section. This report shall also include a detailed analysis of how the increase in eligible medical professional providers will increase access to health care in rural areas of the State.”

Session Laws
2020-88, s. 13(a)-(d), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall revise the supplemental payment program for eligible medical professional providers described in the Medicaid State Plan, Attachment 4.19-B, Section 5, Pages 2 and 3, as required by this section. This payment program shall be called the Average Commercial Rate Supplemental and Directed Payment Program. Effective July 1, 2021, the following two changes to the program shall be implemented:

“(1) The program shall no longer utilize a limit on the number of eligible medical professional providers that may be reimbursed through the program and instead shall utilize a limit on the total payments made under the program.

“(2) Payments under the program shall consist of two components: (i) supplemental payments that increase reimbursement to the average commercial rate under the State Plan and (ii) directed payments that increase reimbursement to the average commercial rate under the managed care system.

“(b) The limitation on total payments made under the Average Commercial Rate Supplemental and Directed Payment Program for eligible medical professional providers shall apply to the combined amount of payments made as supplemental payments under the State Plan and payments made as directed payments under the managed care system and shall be based on the amount of supplemental payments for services provided during the 2018-2019 fiscal year. For services provided on or after July 1, 2021, the total annual supplemental and directed payments made under the Average Commercial Rate Supplemental and Directed Payment Program shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the gross supplemental payments for services provided by eligible medical providers during the 2018-2019 fiscal year, increased at the start of each State fiscal year by an inflation factor determined by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits.

“(c) Consistent with the existing supplemental payment program for eligible medical professional providers, the Department of Health and Human Services shall limit the total amount of supplemental and directed payments that may be received by the eligible providers affiliated with the East Carolina University Brody School of Medicine and the University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill Health Care System. Average commercial rate supplemental payments and directed payments shall not be made for services provided in Wake County.

“(d) The Department of Health and Human Services is not authorized to make any modifications to the supplemental payment program for eligible medical professional providers, except as authorized by this section.”

Session Laws
2011-398, s. 55.1, provides: “Pursuant to
31 U.S.C. § 6504, the Department of Health and Human Services shall request a waiver from the single State agency requirement contained in
42 C.F.R. § 432.10(e)(3) with regard to final decisions in administrative hearings. The waiver application shall include the following:

“(1) The waiver request is made at the direction of the North Carolina General Assembly, which is responsible for the organizational structure of State government.

“(2) The single State agency requirement prevents the establishment of the most effective and efficient arrangement for providing administrative hearings to claimants because it requires that after a hearing and decision by an administrative law judge, the case must be returned to the agency for a final decision. The return to the agency is an unnecessary, time-consuming, and costly additional step.

“(3) The use of another State administrative hearings arrangement will not endanger the objectives of the law authorizing the Medicaid program because the administrative law judges will abide by the properly adopted policies, rules, and regulations of the State Medicaid agency in making final decisions.”

Session Laws
2012-142, s. 10.16(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, shall develop a pilot program to enroll individuals receiving services under the Aids Drug Assistance Program (ADAP) in Inclusive Health North Carolina. The Department shall not implement the pilot program until it obtains actuarial services to ensure the cost neutrality or cost savings of enrolling ADAP recipients in Inclusive Health North Carolina. If an actuary determines that implementation will be cost neutral or achieve savings, the Department shall implement the pilot program for the period commencing January 1, 2013, and terminating December 31, 2013. The purposes of the pilot are (i) to determine cost savings to ADAP through enrollment of ADAP recipients in a preexisting conditions insurance program (PCIP) and (ii) to inform the Department of best practices in transitioning ADAP recipients to Medicaid as they become eligible. The Department shall select up to three HIV/AIDS care provider agencies with the highest number of ADAP recipients to participate in the pilot. The Department shall ensure that the total number of ADAP recipients participating in the pilot meets all of the following requirements:

“(1) Participation does not exceed ten percent (10%) of the total number of ADAP recipients.

“(2) ADAP recipients shall be enrolled in Inclusive Health North Carolina only up to the point that enrollment remains cost neutral or achieves cost savings to ADAP, as determined by an actuary.

“(b) The Department may contract with a vendor to evaluate the results of the pilot program. By no later than April 1, 2014, the Department shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the House Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services on the results of the pilot program. The report shall include all of the following:

“(1) The number of pilot program participants.

“(2) A cost analysis for the pilot program, including a cost comparison between ADAP recipients who received services through Inclusive Health North Carolina and ADAP recipients who received services only through ADAP.

“(3) Feedback from pilot program participants.

“(4) Best practices identified by the Department for transitioning ADAP recipients to Medicaid as they become eligible.

“(5) Improved health outcomes.

“(c) The Department shall use funds appropriated to it to develop and implement the pilot program authorized by this section. The Division of Public Health shall manage the number of ADAP recipients enrolled in Inclusive Health North Carolina as part of the pilot program and the number of ADAP recipients receiving services only through ADAP in order to ensure that pilot program expenditures do not exceed available funds.”

Session Laws
2015-241, s. 12E.2, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services shall work with the Department of Public Safety (DPS) to use DPS funds to purchase pharmaceuticals for the treatment of individuals in the custody of DPS who have been diagnosed with Human Immunodeficiency Virus or Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome (HIV/AIDS) in a manner that allows these funds to be accounted for as State matching funds in the Department of Health and Human Services drawdown of federal Ryan White funds earmarked for the AIDS Drug Assistance Program (ADAP).”

Session Laws
2012-171, ss. 1-3, provide: “SECTION 1. Qualified provider. — The Department of Health and Human Services (Department) shall ensure that Critical Access Behavioral Health Agencies (CABHAs) are the only providers of the following Medicaid services: (i) Community Support Team; (ii) Intensive In-Home; and (iii) Child and Adolescent Day Treatment. CABHAs shall provide these services in accordance with all of the following:

“(1) State statutory requirements regulating the provision of mental health and substance abuse services in Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

“(2) Chapters 21 through 25 and Chapter 27 of Title 10A of the North Carolina Administrative Code.

“(3) Clinical policy requirements specified in Medicaid Clinical Coverage Policy, Section 8, and in the 1915(b) MH/DD/SAS Health Plan Waiver.

“(4) Federal Medicaid policy as outlined in 42 C.F.R. Chapter IV, Subchapter C.

“SECTION 2. Required services. — Each CABHA shall, at a minimum, provide comprehensive clinical assessment, medication management, outpatient therapy, and at least two of the following listed services within an age and disability-specific continuum:

“(1) Intensive In-Home.

“(2) Community Support Team.

“(3) Child and Adolescent Day Treatment.

“(4) Substance Abuse Intensive Outpatient Program.

“(5) Substance Abuse Comprehensive Outpatient Treatment.

“(6) Child and Adolescent Residential Treatment Level II — Family and Program Type, Level III, or Level IV (provision of multiple residential service levels counts as one service).

“(7) Psychosocial Rehabilitation.

“(8) Assertive Community Treatment Team.

“(9) Multi-Systemic Therapy.

“(10) Partial Hospitalization.

“(11) Substance Abuse Medically Monitored Community Residential Treatment.

“(12) Substance Abuse Non-Medical Community Residential Treatment.

“(13) Outpatient Opioid Treatment.

“(14) Any other mental health or substance abuse service required to be delivered by a CABHA as set forth in the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance as approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) or in a waiver approved by CMS pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 1915(b).

“SECTION 3. Staffing. — In accordance with the North Carolina State Plan of Medical Assistance, the Department shall ensure each CABHA meet the following staffing requirements:

“(1) A medical director who is a medical doctor licensed in North Carolina, enrolled as a provider, and in good standing with the Division of Medical Assistance. The medical director shall provide medical, clinical, and quality management oversight of the agency’s CABHA services described in Section 2 of this act.

“(2) A clinical director who shall be one of the following licensed or certified providers:

“a. Licensed medical doctor.

“b. Licensed psychologist.

“c. Licensed clinical social worker.

“d. Licensed psychological associate.

“e. Licensed professional counselor.

“f. Licensed marriage and family therapist.

“g. Licensed nurse practitioner.

“h. Licensed clinical addiction specialist.

“i. Certified clinical supervisor.

“(3) A quality management raining director who shall have any training or experience in quality management or training.”

Session Laws
2012-2, s. 1, provides: “(a) In order to ensure that there is adequate funding in the Medicaid budget for the 2011-2012 fiscal year, the General Assembly directs the Director of the Budget, in conjunction with the State Controller and other necessary State officials, to effectuate the following extraordinary budget adjustments in an amount not to exceed two hundred five million five hundred thousand dollars ($205,500,000). These adjustments are set forth in priority order, and no adjustment shall be made until the preceding adjustment has been completely exhausted in the permissible amount. To the extent necessary to ensure payment to providers for the remainder of the 2011-2012 fiscal year, the following adjustments are authorized in priority order:

“(1) Transfer a minimum of twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000) of funds available within the Department of Health and Human Services. Neither the Director of the Budget nor any other State official, officer, or agency shall, pursuant to this subdivision, authorize any transfer of unearned or borrowed Medicaid Disproportionate Share Receipts or transfer of any funds if the action would create or increase a financial obligation in the 2012-2013 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal year.

“(2) Transfer twenty-one million dollars ($21,000,000) in unanticipated federal Children’s Health Insurance Program Reauthorization Act bonus funds to the State Controller to be deposited in Nontax Budget Code 19978 or the appropriate budget code as determined by the State Controller. These funds are hereby appropriated.

“(3) Transfer ten million five hundred thousand dollars ($10,500,000) currently allocated to the Department of Health and Human Services from Budget Code 19945, the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account, to the State Controller to be deposited in Nontax Budget Code 19978 or the appropriate budget code as determined by the State Controller, notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-4-3

. If funds are transferred pursuant to this subdivision, then notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-4-3

, Section 30.5 of S.L. 2011-145, or any other provision of law, the Office of State Budget and Management shall not allocate or use funds in the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account to replace those funds. These funds are hereby appropriated.

“(4) Transfer of projected 2011-2012 General Fund reversions from all State agencies and departments, including debt service reversions, in the amount of one hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000). Neither the Director of the Budget nor any other State official, officer, or agency shall authorize any such transfer that creates or increases a financial obligation in the 2012-2013 fiscal year or any subsequent fiscal year.

“(5) Transfer twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) currently allocated to the various State agencies from Budget Code 19945, the Repairs and Renovations Reserve Account, to the State Controller to be deposited in Nontax Budget Code 19978 or the appropriate budget code as determined by the State Controller. If funds are transferred pursuant to this subdivision, then notwithstanding

G.S. 143C-4-3

, Section 30.5 of S.L. 2011-145, or any other provision of law, the Office of State Budget and Management shall ensure priority is given to excluding from transfer those funds specifically allocated to State agencies to address health and safety projects. These funds are hereby appropriated.

“(6) Transfer of projected revenue overcollections for the 2011-2012 fiscal year in the amount up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000). These funds are hereby appropriated.

“(b) Subsection (a) of this section applies only to funds required to cover the costs of paying Medicaid providers during the 2011-2012 fiscal year. Transfers under each subdivision of subsection (a) of this section shall be limited to the amounts actually required to pay providers through the end of the 2011-2012 fiscal year. To the extent that the full amount of any of these funds is not required to pay providers through the end of the 2011-2012 fiscal year, (i) the authority to transfer funds shall immediately lapse with respect to the unneeded portions and unneeded adjustments; and (ii) any excess funds transferred shall be transferred back to the source fund.

“(c) On or before October 1, 2012, the Office of State Budget and Management and the Department of Health and Human Services shall report on the measures taken pursuant to this section to the Appropriations/Base Budget Committee of the Senate, the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations.”

Session Laws